Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1213.01
Guidelines to promote uniform
and quality death investigations for county coroners; contents.

The council shall, with
respect to ensuring quality and uniform death investigation processes throughout
the state, develop guidelines to promote uniform and quality death investigations
for county coroners. Such guidelines may include guidance to the county coroner
in:

(1) Determining the need
for autopsies involving:

(a) Deaths of individuals
nineteen years of age or older;

(b) Deaths of individuals
under nineteen years of age;

(c) Sudden, unexplained
infant deaths;

(d) Deaths while in custody;

(e) Deaths caused by
motor vehicle collisions;

(f) Deaths by burning;
and

(g) Suspicious deaths;

(2) The utilization of
investigative tools and equipment;

(3) Entering the death
scene;

(4) Documenting and evaluating
the death scene;

(5) Documenting and evaluating
the body;

(6) Establishing and
recording decedent profile information; and

(7) Completing the death
scene investigation.

Persons investigating
infant deaths and young child deaths may also refer to the recommendations
adopted by the Attorney General with respect to such investigations.

Laws 2009, LB671, § 3.